data/grammar/fst/suffixes-generated.lexc
LEXICON NvSuffixesGenerated
++ajak+1nv:ajak # ;
++ajak+1nv:ajak VerbContinuations ;
++ajak+1nv:SUPPRajak # ;
++ajak+1nv:SUPPRajak VerbContinuations ;
++aq+2nv:aq # ;
++aq+2nv:aq VerbContinuations ;
++aq+2nv:aq AfterApSiRoot ;
++aq+2nv:aq AfterApRiRoot ;
++aq+2nv:SUPPRaq # ;
++aq+2nv:SUPPRaq VerbContinuations ;
++aq+2nv:SUPPRaq AfterApSiRoot ;
++aq+2nv:SUPPRaq AfterApRiRoot ;
++ijaq+1nv:ijaq # ;
++ijaq+1nv:ijaq VerbContinuations ;
++ijaq+1nv:ijaq AfterApIRoot ;
++ijaq+1nv:SUPPRijaq # ;
++ijaq+1nv:SUPPRijaq VerbContinuations ;
++ijaq+1nv:SUPPRijaq AfterApIRoot ;
++illi+1nv:illi # ;
++illi+1nv:illi VerbContinuations ;
++illi+1nv:illi AfterApIRoot ;
++illi+1nv:SUPPRilli # ;
++illi+1nv:SUPPRilli VerbContinuations ;
++illi+1nv:SUPPRilli AfterApIRoot ;
++irujji+1nv:irujji # ;
++irujji+1nv:irujji VerbContinuations ;
++irujji+1nv:SUPPRirujji # ;
++irujji+1nv:SUPPRirujji VerbContinuations ;
++iruti+1nv:iruti # ;
++iruti+1nv:iruti VerbContinuations ;
++iruti+1nv:SUPPRiruti # ;
++iruti+1nv:SUPPRiruti VerbContinuations ;
++isak+1nv:isak # ;
++isak+1nv:isak VerbContinuations ;
++isak+1nv:SUPPRisak # ;
++isak+1nv:SUPPRisak VerbContinuations ;
++jjaq+1nv:jjaq # ;
++jjaq+1nv:jjaq VerbContinuations ;
++jjaq+1nv:SUPPRjjaq # ;
++jjaq+1nv:SUPPRjjaq VerbContinuations ;
++jjiq+2nv:jjiq # ;
++jjiq+2nv:jjiq VerbContinuations ;
++jjiq+2nv:SUPPRjjiq # ;
++jjiq+2nv:SUPPRjjiq VerbContinuations ;
++jjiq+1nv:jjiq # ;
++jjiq+1nv:jjiq VerbContinuations ;
++jjiq+1nv:jjiq AfterApIRoot ;
++jjiq+1nv:SUPPRjjiq # ;
++jjiq+1nv:SUPPRjjiq VerbContinuations ;
++jjiq+1nv:SUPPRjjiq AfterApIRoot ;
++ksaq+1nv:ksaq # ;
++ksaq+1nv:ksaq VerbContinuations ;
++ksaq+1nv:SUPPRksaq # ;
++ksaq+1nv:SUPPRksaq VerbContinuations ;
++li+3nv:li # ;
++li+3nv:li VerbContinuations ;
++li+3nv:SUPPRli # ;
++li+3nv:SUPPRli VerbContinuations ;
++liaq+2nv:liaq # ;
++liaq+2nv:liaq VerbContinuations ;
++liaq+2nv:SUPPRsiaq # ;
++liaq+2nv:SUPPRsiaq VerbContinuations ;
++liaq+2nv:iliaq # ;
++liaq+2nv:iliaq VerbContinuations ;
++liaq+2nv:SUPPRliaq # ;
++liaq+2nv:SUPPRliaq VerbContinuations ;
++lijaq+1nv:lijaq # ;
++lijaq+1nv:lijaq VerbContinuations ;
++lijaq+1nv:SUPPRsijaq # ;
++lijaq+1nv:SUPPRsijaq VerbContinuations ;
++lijaq+1nv:ilijaq # ;
++lijaq+1nv:ilijaq VerbContinuations ;
++lijaq+1nv:SUPPRlijaq # ;
++lijaq+1nv:SUPPRlijaq VerbContinuations ;
++lik+2nv:lik # ;
++lik+2nv:lik VerbContinuations ;
++lik+2nv:SUPPRlik # ;
++lik+2nv:SUPPRlik VerbContinuations ;
++lik+3nv:lik # ;
++lik+3nv:lik VerbContinuations ;
++lik+3nv:lik AfterApSiRoot ;
++lik+3nv:SUPPRlik # ;
++lik+3nv:SUPPRlik VerbContinuations ;
++lik+3nv:SUPPRlik AfterApSiRoot ;
++liq+3nv:liq # ;
++liq+3nv:liq VerbContinuations ;
++liq+3nv:SUPPRliq # ;
++liq+3nv:SUPPRliq VerbContinuations ;
++liq+2nv:liq # ;
++liq+2nv:liq VerbContinuations ;
++liq+2nv:liq AfterApIRoot ;
++liq+2nv:SUPPRsiq # ;
++liq+2nv:SUPPRsiq VerbContinuations ;
++liq+2nv:SUPPRsiq AfterApIRoot ;
++liq+2nv:SUPPRliq # ;
++liq+2nv:SUPPRliq VerbContinuations ;
++liq+2nv:SUPPRliq AfterApIRoot ;
++liqi+1nv:liqi # ;
++liqi+1nv:liqi VerbContinuations ;
++liqi+1nv:SUPPRliqi # ;
++liqi+1nv:SUPPRliqi VerbContinuations ;
++liri+1nv:liri # ;
++liri+1nv:liri VerbContinuations ;
++liri+1nv:iliri # ;
++liri+1nv:iliri VerbContinuations ;
++liri+1nv:SUPPRsiri # ;
++liri+1nv:SUPPRsiri VerbContinuations ;
++liri+1nv:SUPPRliri # ;
++liri+1nv:SUPPRliri VerbContinuations ;
++liuq+1nv:liuq # ;
++liuq+1nv:liuq VerbContinuations ;
++liuq+1nv:liuq AfterApRiRoot ;
++liuq+1nv:SUPPRliuq # ;
++liuq+1nv:SUPPRliuq VerbContinuations ;
++liuq+1nv:SUPPRliuq AfterApRiRoot ;
++liuq+1nv:tiuq # ;
++liuq+1nv:tiuq VerbContinuations ;
++liuq+1nv:tiuq AfterApRiRoot ;
++liuq+1nv:KGUARDtiuq # ;
++liuq+1nv:KGUARDtiuq VerbContinuations ;
++liuq+1nv:KGUARDtiuq AfterApRiRoot ;
++liuq+1nv:siuq # ;
++liuq+1nv:siuq VerbContinuations ;
++liuq+1nv:siuq AfterApRiRoot ;
++liuq+1nv:SUPPRjjiuq # ;
++liuq+1nv:SUPPRjjiuq VerbContinuations ;
++liuq+1nv:SUPPRjjiuq AfterApRiRoot ;
++luk+1nv:luk # ;
++luk+1nv:luk VerbContinuations ;
++luk+1nv:SUPPRluk # ;
++luk+1nv:SUPPRluk VerbContinuations ;
++ngu+1nv:ngu # ;
++ngu+1nv:ngu VerbContinuations ;
++ngu+1nv:SUPPRngu # ;
++ngu+1nv:SUPPRngu VerbContinuations ;
++nguq+1nv:nguq # ;
++nguq+1nv:nguq VerbContinuations ;
++nguq+1nv:nguq AfterApIRoot ;
++nguq+1nv:nnguq # ;
++nguq+1nv:nnguq VerbContinuations ;
++nguq+1nv:nnguq AfterApIRoot ;
++nguq+1nv:inguq # ;
++nguq+1nv:inguq VerbContinuations ;
++nguq+1nv:inguq AfterApIRoot ;
++nguq+1nv:innguq # ;
++nguq+1nv:innguq VerbContinuations ;
++nguq+1nv:innguq AfterApIRoot ;
++nguq+1nv:NASALnguq # ;
++nguq+1nv:NASALnguq VerbContinuations ;
++nguq+1nv:NASALnguq AfterApIRoot ;
++nguq+1nv:NASALnnguq # ;
++nguq+1nv:NASALnnguq VerbContinuations ;
++nguq+1nv:NASALnnguq AfterApIRoot ;
++nguq+1nv:SUPPRruq # ;
++nguq+1nv:SUPPRruq VerbContinuations ;
++nguq+1nv:SUPPRruq AfterApIRoot ;
++nguq+1nv:SUPPRnguq # ;
++nguq+1nv:SUPPRnguq VerbContinuations ;
++nguq+1nv:SUPPRnguq AfterApIRoot ;
++nguq+1nv:SUPPRnnguq # ;
++nguq+1nv:SUPPRnnguq VerbContinuations ;
++nguq+1nv:SUPPRnnguq AfterApIRoot ;
++niaq+1nv:niaq # ;
++niaq+1nv:niaq VerbContinuations ;
++niaq+1nv:NASALniaq # ;
++niaq+1nv:NASALniaq VerbContinuations ;
++qajaanngit+1nv:qajaanngit # ;
++qajaanngit+1nv:qajaanngit VerbContinuations ;
++qajaanngit+1nv:qajaangit # ;
++qajaanngit+1nv:qajaangit VerbContinuations ;
++qajaanngit+1nv:SUPPRqajaanngit # ;
++qajaanngit+1nv:SUPPRqajaanngit VerbContinuations ;
++qajaanngit+1nv:SUPPRqajaangit # ;
++qajaanngit+1nv:SUPPRqajaangit VerbContinuations ;
++qaq+1nv:qaq # ;
++qaq+1nv:qaq VerbContinuations ;
++qaq+1nv:SUPPRqaq # ;
++qaq+1nv:SUPPRqaq VerbContinuations ;
++qauq+1nv:qauq # ;
++qauq+1nv:qauq VerbContinuations ;
++qauq+1nv:SUPPRqauq # ;
++qauq+1nv:SUPPRqauq VerbContinuations ;
++qquqtu+1nv:qquqtu # ;
++qquqtu+1nv:qquqtu VerbContinuations ;
++qquqtu+1nv:quqtu # ;
++qquqtu+1nv:quqtu VerbContinuations ;
++qquqtu+1nv:SUPPRqquqtu # ;
++qquqtu+1nv:SUPPRqquqtu VerbContinuations ;
++qquqtu+1nv:iquqtu # ;
++qquqtu+1nv:iquqtu VerbContinuations ;
++qquqtu+1nv:SUPPRquqtu # ;
++qquqtu+1nv:SUPPRquqtu VerbContinuations ;
++si+4nv:si # ;
++si+4nv:si VerbContinuations ;
++si+4nv:si AfterApIRoot ;
++siaq+1nv:siaq # ;
++siaq+1nv:siaq VerbContinuations ;
++siri+1nv:siri # ;
++siri+1nv:siri VerbContinuations ;
++siri+1nv:SUPPRsiri # ;
++siri+1nv:SUPPRsiri VerbContinuations ;
++siuq+1nv:siuq # ;
++siuq+1nv:siuq VerbContinuations ;
++siuq+1nv:siuq AfterApRiRoot ;
++sungnik+1nv:sungnik # ;
++sungnik+1nv:sungnik VerbContinuations ;
++taaq+1nv:taaq # ;
++taaq+1nv:taaq VerbContinuations ;
++taaq+1nv:KGUARDtaaq # ;
++taaq+1nv:KGUARDtaaq VerbContinuations ;
++taq+2nv:taq # ;
++taq+2nv:taq VerbContinuations ;
++taq+2nv:KGUARDtaq # ;
++taq+2nv:KGUARDtaq VerbContinuations ;
++taqaq+1nv:taqaq # ;
++taqaq+1nv:taqaq VerbContinuations ;
++taqaq+1nv:KGUARDtaqaq # ;
++taqaq+1nv:KGUARDtaqaq VerbContinuations ;
++taqaq+1nv:SUPPRtaqaq # ;
++taqaq+1nv:SUPPRtaqaq VerbContinuations ;
++ttuq+1nv:ttuq # ;
++ttuq+1nv:ttuq VerbContinuations ;
++ttuq+1nv:KGUARDttuq # ;
++ttuq+1nv:KGUARDttuq VerbContinuations ;
++ttuq+1nv:SUPPRttuq # ;
++ttuq+1nv:SUPPRttuq VerbContinuations ;
++tu+1nv:tu # ;
++tu+1nv:tu VerbContinuations ;
++tu+1nv:KGUARDtu # ;
++tu+1nv:KGUARDtu VerbContinuations ;
++tu+1nv:tuu # ;
++tu+1nv:tuu VerbContinuations ;
++tu+1nv:KGUARDtuu # ;
++tu+1nv:KGUARDtuu VerbContinuations ;
++tu+1nv:SUPPRtu # ;
++tu+1nv:SUPPRtu VerbContinuations ;
++tu+1nv:SUPPRtuu # ;
++tu+1nv:SUPPRtuu VerbContinuations ;
++tuq+1nv:tuq # ;
++tuq+1nv:tuq VerbContinuations ;
++tuq+1nv:KGUARDtuq # ;
++tuq+1nv:KGUARDtuq VerbContinuations ;
++tuuq+2nv:tuuq # ;
++tuuq+2nv:tuuq VerbContinuations ;
++tuuq+2nv:KGUARDtuuq # ;
++tuuq+2nv:KGUARDtuuq VerbContinuations ;
++tuuq+2nv:SUPPRtuuq # ;
++tuuq+2nv:SUPPRtuuq VerbContinuations ;
++u+1nv:u # ;
++u+1nv:u VerbContinuations ;
++u+1nv:SUPPRu # ;
++u+1nv:SUPPRu VerbContinuations ;
++u+1nv:iu # ;
++u+1nv:iu VerbContinuations ;
++vaq+1nv:vaq # ;
++vaq+1nv:vaq VerbContinuations ;
++vaq+1nv:vaq AfterApIRoot ;
++vaq+1nv:paq # ;
++vaq+1nv:paq VerbContinuations ;
++vaq+1nv:paq AfterApIRoot ;
++vasik+1nv:vasik # ;
++vasik+1nv:vasik VerbContinuations ;
++vasik+1nv:pasik # ;
++vasik+1nv:pasik VerbContinuations ;
++vvaluk+1nv:vvaluk # ;
++vvaluk+1nv:vvaluk VerbContinuations ;
++vvaluk+1nv:SUPPRvvaluk # ;
++vvaluk+1nv:SUPPRvvaluk VerbContinuations ;
++qsuq+1nv:SUPPRqsuq # ;
++qsuq+1nv:SUPPRqsuq VerbContinuations ;
++qsuq+1nv:SUPPRtsuq # ;
++qsuq+1nv:SUPPRtsuq VerbContinuations ;
++ruq+1nv:SUPPRruq # ;
++ruq+1nv:SUPPRruq VerbContinuations ;
++ruq+1nv:SUPPRnngaq # ;
++ruq+1nv:SUPPRnngaq VerbContinuations ;

LEXICON NvSuffixesGeneratedSpeculative
++ggiq+1nv:ggiq # ;
++ggiq+1nv:ggiq VerbContinuations ;
++ggiq+1nv:SUPPRggiq # ;
++ggiq+1nv:SUPPRggiq VerbContinuations ;
++gi+1nv:gi # ;
++gi+1nv:gi VerbContinuations ;
++gi+1nv:igi # ;
++gi+1nv:igi VerbContinuations ;
++gi+1nv:SUPPRgi # ;
++gi+1nv:SUPPRgi VerbContinuations ;
++gi+1nv:SUPPRri # ;
++gi+1nv:SUPPRri VerbContinuations ;
++giik+2nv:giik # ;
++giik+2nv:giik VerbContinuations ;
++giik+2nv:igiik # ;
++giik+2nv:igiik VerbContinuations ;
++giik+2nv:SUPPRgiik # ;
++giik+2nv:SUPPRgiik VerbContinuations ;
++giik+2nv:SUPPRriik # ;
++giik+2nv:SUPPRriik VerbContinuations ;
++gik+1nv:gik # ;
++gik+1nv:gik VerbContinuations ;
++gik+1nv:SUPPRgik # ;
++gik+1nv:SUPPRgik VerbContinuations ;
++gik+1nv:SUPPRrik # ;
++gik+1nv:SUPPRrik VerbContinuations ;
++guk+1nv:guk # ;
++guk+1nv:guk VerbContinuations ;
++guk+1nv:guq # ;
++guk+1nv:guq VerbContinuations ;
++guk+1nv:SUPPRguk # ;
++guk+1nv:SUPPRguk VerbContinuations ;
++guk+1nv:SUPPRguq # ;
++guk+1nv:SUPPRguq VerbContinuations ;
++guk+1nv:SUPPRruk # ;
++guk+1nv:SUPPRruk VerbContinuations ;
++guk+1nv:SUPPRruq # ;
++guk+1nv:SUPPRruq VerbContinuations ;
++guq+2nv:guq # ;
++guq+2nv:guq VerbContinuations ;
++guq+2nv:guq AfterApIRoot ;
++guq+2nv:SUPPRguq # ;
++guq+2nv:SUPPRguq VerbContinuations ;
++guq+2nv:SUPPRguq AfterApIRoot ;
++guq+2nv:SUPPRruq # ;
++guq+2nv:SUPPRruq VerbContinuations ;
++guq+2nv:SUPPRruq AfterApIRoot ;
++iq+1nv:iq # ;
++iq+1nv:iq VerbContinuations ;
++iq+1nv:iq AfterApSiRoot ;
++iq+1nv:iq AfterApIRoot ;
++iq+1nv:iq AfterApNnikRoot ;
++iq+1nv:SUPPRiq # ;
++iq+1nv:SUPPRiq VerbContinuations ;
++iq+1nv:SUPPRiq AfterApSiRoot ;
++iq+1nv:SUPPRiq AfterApIRoot ;
++iq+1nv:SUPPRiq AfterApNnikRoot ;
++it+3nv:it # ;
++it+3nv:it VerbContinuations ;
++it+3nv:iit # ;
++it+3nv:iit VerbContinuations ;
++it+3nv:SUPPRit # ;
++it+3nv:SUPPRit VerbContinuations ;
++it+2nv:it # ;
++it+2nv:it VerbContinuations ;
++it+2nv:iit # ;
++it+2nv:iit VerbContinuations ;
++it+2nv:SUPPRit # ;
++it+2nv:SUPPRit VerbContinuations ;
++kit+1nv:kit OnlyModeGerEndings ;
++kit+1nv:SUPPRkit OnlyModeGerEndings ;

LEXICON OnlyJunniiqVvSuffix
++junniiq+1vv:junniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:junniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:juniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:juniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:juniq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:juniq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:gunniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:gunniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:guniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:guniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:guniq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:guniq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:tunniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:tunniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:KGUARDtunniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:KGUARDtunniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:tuniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:tuniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:KGUARDtuniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:KGUARDtuniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:tuniq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:tuniq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:KGUARDtuniq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:KGUARDtuniq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRgunniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRgunniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRguniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRguniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRguniq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRguniq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRrunniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRrunniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRruniiq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRruniiq VerbContinuations ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRruniq # ;
++junniiq+1vv:SUPPRruniq VerbContinuations ;
